California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) The commissioner shall, after notice and hearing, promulgate reasonable rules and regulations specifying the manner and type of records to be maintained by those licensees acting as insurance agents and brokers and the location where the records shall be kept. Those records shall be open to inspection or examination by the commissioner at all times, and the commissioner may at any time require the licensee to furnish any information maintained or required to be maintained in those records.

(b) Every licensee acting as an insurance agent and broker shall keep the records as required by the regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Every licensee acting as an insurance agent and broker employing a licensee in the capacity of an insurance solicitor shall keep the records required by the regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (a) for any insurance transacted by the insurance solicitor in the capacity of employee of the employing licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 782, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1728.

Every resident insurance property broker-agent and every resident insurance casualty broker-agent shall maintain a principal office in this state for the transaction of business. The address of the office shall, pursuant to Section 1658, be specified on all applications for license and renewal applications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 29.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1729.

Every licensee and every applicant for a license shall immediately notify the commissioner using an electronic service approved by the commissioner of any change in that licensee or applicant’s email, residence, principal business, or mailing address as given to the commissioner pursuant to Sections 1658 and 1728.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 19.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1729.2.

(a) An applicant or licensee shall notify the commissioner when any of the background information set forth in this section changes after the application has been submitted or the license has been issued. If the licensee is listed as an endorsee on any business entity license, the licensee shall also provide this notice to any officer, director, or partner listed on that business entity license.

(b) A business entity licensee, upon learning of a change in background information pertaining to any unlicensed person listed on its business entity license or application therefor, shall notify the commissioner of that change. The changes subject to this requirement include changes pertaining to any unlicensed officer, director, partner, member, or controlling person, or
 any other natural person named under the business entity license or in an application therefor.

(c) The following definitions apply for the purposes of this section:

(1) “License” includes all types of licenses issued by the commissioner pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621), Chapter 5A (commencing with Section 1759), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1781.1), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800), and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831) of Part 2 of Division 1, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10110) of Part 2 of Division 2, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12280) of Part 5 of Division 2, Article 8 (commencing with Section 12418) of Chapter 1 of Part 6 of Division 2, and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 5.

(2) “Background information” means any of the following: a misdemeanor or felony conviction; a filing of felony criminal charges in state or federal court; an administrative action regarding a professional or occupational license or regarding conduct or activity for which a professional or occupational license was required but not possessed; an administrative or civil action filed by, or on behalf of, a government or regulatory agency alleging any unlawful conduct, activity, or omission; any licensee’s discharge or attempt to discharge, in a personal or organizational bankruptcy proceeding, an obligation regarding any insurance premiums or fiduciary funds owed to any person, including a premium finance company, or managing general agent; and any admission, or judicial finding or determination, of fraud, misappropriation or conversion of funds, misrepresentation, or breach of fiduciary duty.

(3) “Applicant” and “licensee” include individual and organization applicants and licensees, and officers, directors, partners, members, and controlling persons (as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1668.5) of an organization.

(d) Notification to the commissioner shall be in writing and shall be sent within 30 days of the date the applicant or licensee learns of the change in background information.

(e) The commissioner may adopt regulations necessary or desirable to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 558, Sec. 12.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1729.5.

A property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent who has a service contract with a corporation licensed under this code or who is a stockholder or member of any incorporated association or corporation organized under the Corporations Code for the purpose of providing services to property broker-agents, casualty broker-agents, or life agents may use the name of that corporation or association on any stationery or advertisements and other written or printed matter used to identify the business of the property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent provided that the name of the property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent is clearly identified as bearing only that relationship to the corporation or association in one of the
 following ways:

“Representing ____;”

“A stockholder of ____;”

“Placing business through ____;”

“Using services of ____.”

The use of the corporation or association name in the manner provided in this section shall not constitute such use as would mislead the public within the meaning of Section 1724.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 30.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1730.

A licensee shall not misrepresent the type of license under which that licensee is transacting insurance, nor shall that licensee engage in transactions not authorized by the licenses held by that licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 20.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1730.5.

A life agent, a property broker-agent, and a casualty broker-agent shall provide to all insureds or applicants at the time of application or receipt of premium moneys the effective date of coverage, if known, or the circumstances under which coverage will be effective if there exists conditions precedent to coverage. This section shall apply only to coverage for personal lines of insurance, such as private passenger automobile, homeowner and renter insurance, personal liability, and individual disability and health insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 31.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1730.6.

(a) Every property broker-agent and every casualty broker-agent shall, prior to arranging premium financing or transacting any agreement for the periodic payment of premium for any new or renewal policy of insurance specified in Section 660, disclose to any applicant or prospective insured any options for premium financing or the periodic payment of premium from the insurer or, if applicable, the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan, that are available for the insurance being purchased. This disclosure may be in the form of a written document. In the event the applicant or prospective insured elects to enter into an agreement for premium financing, the property broker-agent and casualty broker-agent shall comply with the requirements of
 Section 778.4.

(b) For purposes of this section and Section 778.4:

(1) “Periodic payment of premium” means the payment plan provided by the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan, or a payment plan provided by the insurer that allows the total premium to be paid in more than one installment.

(2) “Arrange premium financing” means assisting an applicant or prospective insured to arrange for payment of the premium through a premium finance agreement as defined in Section 778.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 32.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1731.

A person licensed as a broker-agent shall be deemed to be acting as an insurance agent in the transaction of insurance placed with those insurers for whom a notice of appointment has been filed with the Insurance Commissioner in accordance with Section 1704 and is then in force.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1420, Sec. 56.5.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 77 of Ch. 1420.)
-------------------------------------------

1732.

A person acting as an insurance broker may, on behalf of an insurance company, collect and transmit premium or return premium and deliver policies and other documents evidencing insurance. Performance of those functions shall not be construed for any purpose to mean that the person is an insurance agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 304, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1733.

All funds received by any person acting as a licensee under this chapter, Chapter 5A (commencing with Section 1759), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800), as premium or return premium on or under any policy of insurance or undertaking of bail, are received and held by that person in that person’s fiduciary capacity. A person who diverts or appropriates those fiduciary funds to that person’s own use is guilty of theft and punishable for theft as provided by law. Any premium that a premium financer agrees to advance pursuant to the terms of a premium finance agreement shall constitute fiduciary funds as defined in this section only if actually received by a person licensed
 in one or more of the capacities herein specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 21.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1734.

This section applies to a person licensed, hereinafter “licensee,” whether under a permanent license, restricted license, temporary license, or certificate of convenience, to act in any of the capacities specified in Section 1733. If fiduciary funds, as defined in Section 1733, are received by the licensee, the licensee shall do one of the following:

(a) Remit premiums, less commissions, and return premiums received or held by the licensee to the insurer or the person entitled thereto.

(b) Maintain those fiduciary funds at all times in a trust account in a bank or savings and loan association, within any state of the United States, which
 account is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), and is licensed by any state government within the United States or by the United States government, separate from any other account, in an amount at least equal to the premiums and return premiums, net of commissions, received by the licensee and unpaid to the persons entitled thereto or, at their direction or pursuant to written contract, for the account of those persons. However, that person may commingle with those fiduciary funds in the account those additional funds as the licensee may deem prudent for the purpose of advancing premiums, establishing reserves for the paying of return commissions, or for those contingencies as may arise in the licensee’s business of receiving and transmitting premium or return premium funds.

(c) Maintain those fiduciary funds
 pursuant to Section 1734.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 22.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1734.5.

(a) (1) If fiduciary funds, as defined in Section 1733, are received by any person licensed, hereinafter the “licensee,” whether under a permanent license, restricted license, temporary license, or certificate of convenience, to act in any of the capacities specified in Section 1733, and the funds are not remitted, or maintained pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1734, except as provided in subdivision (f), the funds shall be maintained in any of the following:

(A) United States government bonds and treasury certificates or other obligations for which the full faith and credit of the United States are pledged for payment of principal and interest.

(B) Certificates of deposit of banks or savings and loan associations, which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) and licensed by any state government within the United States or by the United States government.

(C) Repurchase agreements collateralized by securities issued by the United States government.

(D) Either of the following:

(i) Bonds and other obligations of this state or of any local agency or district of the State of California having the power, without limit as to rate or amount, to levy taxes or assessments upon all property within its boundaries subject to taxation or assessment by the local agency or district to pay the
 principal and interest of the obligations.

(ii) Revenue bonds and other obligations payable solely out of the revenues from a revenue-producing property owned, controlled, or operated by this state, or a local agency or district, or by a department, board, agency, or authority thereof.

(2) The bonds and obligations described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) shall either have maturities of not more than one year or afford the holder of the obligation the unilateral right to redeem the obligation from its issuer within one year from date of purchase at an amount equal to, or greater than, its par value, and the bonds and obligations shall be required to be rated at least Aa1, MIG-1/VMIG-1, or Prime-1 by Moody’s Investor Service, Inc., or AA, SP-1, or A-1 by Standard and Poor’s
 Corporation.

(3) For the fiduciary funds maintained as provided in paragraph (1), the bonds, certificates, obligations, certificates of deposit, and repurchase agreements shall be valued on the basis of their acquisition cost.

(b) As a condition to maintaining the fiduciary funds pursuant to this section, a written agreement shall be obtained from each and every insurer or person entitled thereto authorizing the maintenance and the retention of any earnings accruing on the funds.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (f), evidence of the funds shall be maintained at all times in a trust account in a bank or savings and loan association within any state of the United States, which account is insured by the FDIC
 and which institution is licensed by any state government within the United States or by the United States government, separate from any other funds, in an amount at least equal to the premiums and return premiums, net of commissions received by the licensee and unpaid to the persons entitled thereto, or, at their discretion or pursuant to a written contract, for the account of these persons. However, the person may commingle with the fiduciary funds any additional funds as the licensee may deem prudent for the purpose of advancing premiums, establishing reserves for the paying of return premiums, or for any contingencies that may arise in the business of receiving and transmitting premium or return premium funds by the licensee.

(d) All administrative actions involving trust accounts shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the
 commissioner. All suits involving trust accounts shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of California and the federal courts located within the State of California.

(1) Any licensee specified in Section 1733 utilizing a trust account located outside of the State of California shall be required to file and maintain in the commissioner’s office, as a condition of maintaining a license, a written designation identifying the agent for service of process in this state for the bank or savings and loan association located outside the State of California being utilized by the licensee. The designated agent shall be a person residing in this state. The writing shall state the name of the agent and the agent’s place of business in this state with sufficient particularity so that the agent can readily be found by peace
 officers or process servers. Appointment of an agent reasonably available for service of papers, notice, proof of loss, summons, or other process during business hours shall be continuously maintained by every licensee subject to this article while the licensee holds a valid and unrevoked license.

(2) The commissioner shall not have jurisdiction over any disputes arising between parties concerning the maintenance of fiduciary funds pursuant to this section. However, this subdivision shall not otherwise affect the authority granted to the commissioner over fiduciary funds by other provisions of this code, or regulations adopted pursuant thereto. As used in this subdivision, “parties” shall not include the commissioner.

(e) Investment losses to the principal of fiduciary funds maintained
 pursuant to this section are the responsibility of the person licensed, whether under a permanent license, restricted license, temporary license, or certificate of convenience, to act in any of the capacities specified in Section 1733, and any obligation to insurers or other persons entitled to the fiduciary funds shall in no way be diminished due to any loss in the value to the principal of the fiduciary funds held pursuant to this section.

(f) Any fiduciary funds, as defined in Section 1733, received as cash, lawful money of the United States, or freely tradeable currency of any foreign government, by any person licensed, whether under a permanent license, restricted license, temporary license, or certificate of convenience, to act in any of the capacities specified in Section 1733, shall comply with Section 1734, but shall initially be
 maintained in a trust account in a bank or savings and loan association in California, licensed by the State of
 California or the United States government and insured by the FDIC.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 23.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1735.

(a) As used in this section, a managing general agent is a licensed property broker-agent and casualty broker-agent, or a life agent to whom all of the following apply:

(1) Has a written management contract and an appointment on file with the commissioner in accordance with Section 1704, which appointment is then in force, with one or more admitted insurers covering business transacted by the insurer in a substantial portion of the State of California.

(2) Under the contract specified in paragraph (1), manages the transaction of either all or one or more of the classes of insurance written by those insurers in that
 territory or the transactions therein by those insurers under a specified fictitious underwriter’s name.

(3) Has the power to appoint, supervise, and terminate the appointment of local agents in that territory.

(4) Has the power to accept or decline risks.

(5) Collects premium moneys from producing broker-agents and remits those moneys to those insurers pursuant to the account current system.

(b) The managing general agent shall, with respect to any principals for whom fiduciary funds are held, comply with Section 1734.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 33.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1735.5.

A property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or surplus line broker, hereinafter the “licensee,” may offset funds due an insured for return premiums on any policy against amounts due the licensee from the same insured for unpaid premiums on the same or any other policy. Any insurer may pay return premiums to any property broker-agent or any
 casualty broker-agent for that purpose. This section shall not invalidate an assignment of return premium made concurrently with policy issuance as security for financing that premium, nor the right of the assignee, or the assignee’s assign, to enforce the assignment as a prior claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 24.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1736.

If any acts are forbidden or conduct prescribed by any provisions of this code, such acts shall not be performed and such conduct shall be followed by both the organization and by any person named to exercise the power and perform the duties under any license issued to such organization.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1736.5.

(a) Every licensee and applicant shall promptly reply in writing to an inquiry from the commissioner relative to an application for, or the retention or renewal of, a license, or an investigation relating to a consumer complaint or a matter relating to a producer licensing background change reporting requirement under Section 1729.2. The commissioner may revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew a license if the licensee or applicant does not promptly reply in writing to an inquiry from the commissioner.

(b) For purposes of this section, “promptly reply” means to provide a written response to the inquiry that is received by the commissioner no later than 21 days after the date the inquiry was mailed or otherwise communicated to the applicant or licensee.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “licensee” and “applicant” have the same definitions as those contained in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 1729.2, and the licenses covered by this section are the same as those covered by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1729.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 312, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Disciplinary Actions [1737. - 1748.5.]

1737.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect the public by requiring and maintaining professional standards of conduct on the part of all persons licensed hereunder.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1738.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke a permanent license issued pursuant to this chapter on any of the grounds set forth in Article 6 hereof on which the commissioner may deny an application. When the word “applicant” is used in those grounds, the word shall for the application of this section be the words “the holder of a permanent license.” A suspension or revocation based upon a ground set forth in Section 1669 may be without notice or hearing. Suspension or revocation of any permanent license, except a restricted license, on a ground other than that set forth in Section 1669 shall be after notice and hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter
 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner has all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 25.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1738.5.

Upon the request of the department, a proceeding held pursuant to Section 1668, 1668.5, 1738, 1739, or 12921.8 that involves allegations of misconduct perpetrated against a person age 65 or over shall be held within 90 days after receipt by the department of the notice of defense, unless a continuance of the hearing is granted by the department or the administrative law judge. If the Office of Administrative Hearings cannot accommodate a hearing within 90 days, the hearing shall be set on the earliest available date and the delay shall not prejudice either party. When the matter has been set for hearing, only the administrative law judge may grant a continuance of the hearing. The administrative law judge may, but need not, grant a continuance of the hearing, only upon finding the existence of one or more of
 the following:

(a) The death or incapacitating illness of a party, a representative or attorney of a party, a witness to an essential fact, or of the parent, child, or member of the household of any of these persons, when it is not feasible to substitute another representative, attorney, or witness because of the proximity of the hearing date.

(b) Lack of notice of hearing as provided in Section 11509 of the Government Code.

(c) A material change in the status of the case where a change in the parties or pleadings requires postponement, or an executed settlement or stipulated findings of fact obviate the need for hearing. A partial amendment of the pleadings shall not be good cause for continuance to the extent that the unamended portion of the pleadings is ready to be heard.

(d) A stipulation for continuance signed by all parties, or their authorized representatives, that is communicated with the request for continuance to the administrative law judge no later than 25 business days before the hearing.

(e) The substitution of the representative or attorney of a party upon showing that the substitution is required.

(f) The unavailability of a party, representative, or attorney of a party, or witness to an essential fact, due to a conflicting and required appearance in a judicial matter if, when the hearing date was set, the person did not know and could neither anticipate nor at any time avoid the conflict, and the conflict, with the request for continuance, is immediately communicated to the administrative law judge.

(g) The
 unavailability of a party, a representative or attorney of a party, or a material witness due to an unavoidable emergency.

(h) Failure by a party to comply with a timely discovery request if the continuance request is made by the party who requested the discovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 19.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1739.

Where a permanent license is held by an organization both the organization itself and any natural persons named thereon shall, for the purposes of this article, be deemed to be the holders thereof. If that natural person commits any act or fails to perform any duty which is a ground for suspension or revocation of the license held by the organization, that action may be taken against the organization. If any natural person named under an organization license commits any act or fails to perform any duty which is a ground for the suspension or revocation of any license held by the organization, the commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of the organization, or the license of the natural person, or may take all of those steps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1420, Sec. 61.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 77 of Ch. 1420.)
-------------------------------------------

1740.

The certificate of the commissioner certifying any facts found after a hearing held under this chapter shall be prima facie evidence of the facts set forth therein.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1741.

If the commissioner finds, after a hearing, that there are grounds for the denial of an application for a license to act in any capacity set forth in Article 1 of this chapter or if the commissioner finds, after a hearing, that any licensee has violated the provisions of this code and that the violation would justify the suspension or revocation of any license held by the person, the commissioner may order the licensee to prove the licensee’s qualifications by taking and passing the qualifying examination for any license held or applied for. The commissioner shall set the time for the taking of the examination. Failure thereof by any licensee shall result in the termination of all licenses of the licensee to which the examination
 is applicable. An order to take the examination may be in lieu of any other action in respect to the application or the license, or, except in the case of revocation, may be in addition to any other action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 26.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1742.

Where a person who is or has been licensed under this chapter has been found by the commissioner to have violated any provision of this code which would justify the suspension or revocation of a license held, or where a person is applying for a license under this chapter and there exists grounds for the denial by the commissioner of his application, the commissioner may, after hearing, revoke the license held or deny the application for an unrestricted license, and in lieu thereof issue to such a person a restricted license. The commissioner may impose any reasonable conditions upon the acquisition of such restricted license or the conduct of the holder thereof. The holder of the restricted license has no property right therein and the commissioner may, with or without either hearing or cause, suspend or revoke a restricted license. If a hearing is held under this section, it shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code. The holder of a restricted license is subject to all the provisions of this code and such license shall be kept in force and renewed in the same manner, at the same time, and subject to the same conditions and fees as are applicable to an unrestricted license to act in the same capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1742.2.

The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to comply with the requirements of Section 1033 of Title 18 of the United States Code no later than January 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 782, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1742.3.

(a) The commissioner may, without hearing, issue an order denying an application by a business entity for an unrestricted license and granting instead a restricted license. The commissioner may do so when a controlling person of the business entity, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1668.5, holds a restricted license. The commissioner may impose any reasonable restriction on the business entity’s authority to transact insurance that is similar or related to the restriction imposed upon the controlling person. A description of the nature and scope of the restriction imposed upon the business entity shall be included in the commissioner’s order. The business entity shall have no property right in the restricted license and the commissioner may, with or without
 hearing or cause, suspend or revoke the restricted license. The restricted license shall be issued in the normal course of business following the issuance of the order and shall remain in effect pending the outcome of any request for reconsideration and any decision following a hearing pursuant to that request.

(b) The business entity may request reconsideration of the commissioner’s decision to deny an unrestricted license within 30 days from the date that the decision is mailed to the entity. If the business entity requests a hearing on the request for reconsideration, the hearing shall be conducted pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 11445.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the business entity shall bear the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that an unrestricted license should have been granted instead of a restricted license. If the commissioner determines, after a
 hearing, that the business entity should have been granted an unrestricted license, the entity shall be granted that unrestricted license retroactive to the date of the granting of the restricted license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 13.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1743.

The lapse or suspension of any license by operation of law, by failure to renew or by its voluntary surrender shall not deprive the commissioner of jurisdiction or right to institute or proceed with any disciplinary proceeding against such license, to render a decision suspending or revoking such license or to establish and make a record of the facts of any violation of law for any lawful purpose. No such disciplinary proceeding shall be instituted against any license after the expiration of five years from the termination of such license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1744.

The filing of a statement of issues pursuant to Chapter 5, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code specifying grounds for denial of an application for a license to act in any capacity under this chapter shall automatically suspend any certificate of convenience issued with respect to any such application until the decision and order in the matter of such statement of issues becomes final, and if the order in such matter is for the denial of the application for any such license, the certificate of convenience with respect thereto shall automatically terminate on the effective date of such denial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1747.

When the commissioner may determine or have good cause to believe that any property broker-agent or casualty broker-agent has failed to keep or maintain the records required by Section 1727, in connection with or in lieu of any other disciplinary action against the license of the licensee, the commissioner may issue the commissioner’s order requiring the licensee to establish and currently complete those records within 60 days from the date of the order. When the order is given in lieu of other disciplinary action, notice of the order may be given by certified mail addressed to the office of the licensee. Failure of the licensee to comply with the order within the time specified therein shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the license or
 licenses of the licensee, and the proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 27.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.

The commissioner, in any proceeding under the provisions of this article, may, by an alternative order, permit a licensee to elect in writing to pay a specified money penalty, within a specified time in lieu of a license suspension or other permitted action. If the licensee so elects, the sum of money specified shall be paid to the commissioner for the use of the State of California. The sum specified shall not exceed:

(a) Four thousand dollars ($4,000) for each offense.

(b) Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in the aggregate for all offenses involved in any one proceeding.

(c) Thirty percent of the gross commissions on insurance transacted by the licensee in the preceding calendar year.

(d) Any amount proven, or admitted, in the proceeding to have been received and retained by the licensee in violation of this code.

The commissioner shall determine the monetary penalty to be paid in any given case and in so doing shall not be limited to the selection of the penalty specified in any one of the above subdivisions, as compared with the penalty in any of the other three subdivisions, that will result in the payment by the licensee of the least amount.

The amount of reimbursement the commissioner orders shall be the amount that fully reimburses the commissioner for the commissioner’s costs, or any lesser amount that the commissioner determines is the most the subject of the order can pay in the event the subject is financially unable to fully reimburse the commissioner.

If a licensee fails to pay a monetary penalty or reimbursement within the time specified in the order, the commissioner, unless the order is lawfully stayed, may deny a pending application for a license, or may revoke or suspend the license of the subject of the order for a period of time as determined by the commissioner. If, for any reason, an application is denied, or a license is revoked or suspended, before the subject of the order has paid the full amount of an ordered monetary penalty or reimbursement, the balance owed shall be paid before a license may be reinstated or an application for any new license may be granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 782, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1748.5.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions are applicable:

(1) “Production agency” means any person or organization licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621), Chapter 5A (commencing with Section 1759), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831).

(2) “Subject person” means any person who has participated or may participate in any manner in the business of a production agency, or any person licensed as a producer.

(3) “Insurer”
 means any domestic insurer, and any insurer that
 is admitted to transact insurance in this state, provided that if a subject person of an insurer is not a resident of California, or operating out of a place of business within California, then the subject person shall be engaged in direct management, direction, or conduct of the business of insurance in California in order to come within the provisions of this section.

(b) If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds all of the following, the commissioner may issue an order removing a subject person from the subject person’s office or employment with the production agency and prohibiting the subject person from participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of an insurer or production agency, except with the prior consent of the commissioner:

(1) (A) The subject person has engaged in misconduct with respect to the business of insurance that has caused financial or other injury to any person, or

(B) The subject person has engaged in fraud, or willful acts or omissions involving dishonesty that exposed a person to financial or other injury; and

(2) The subject person’s conduct or practice demonstrates unfitness to continue as a subject person.

(c) (1) If the commissioner gives written notice pursuant to subdivision (b) to a subject person, the commissioner shall immediately issue an order prohibiting the subject person from participating in any manner in the business of insurance, except with the prior